Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4108
Database of registered health care staffing agencies; contents.

(1) The department shall create a database of health care staffing agencies registered under the Health Care Staffing Agency Registration Act. The department shall make the database accessible to the public on its website.

(2) The database shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(a) The date of registration approval for the health care staffing agency; and

(b) The date of expiration or revocation of the registration of the health care staffing agency.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 14.
July 1, 2027